Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.040

Travel expenses.

The members of the joint committee shall serve without additional compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 for attending meetings of the joint committee or a subcommittee of the joint committee, or while engaged on other business authorized by the joint committee.

[ 1996 c 288 s 6; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 134; 1951 c 43 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.